Massachusetts, session 194th, H3785.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there is hereby
established a special commission to identify, preserve and commemorate historic roadways in
Massachusetts to consist of 2 members of the Senate, one to be appointed by the Senate
President and one to be appointed by the minority leader; 2 members of the House of
Representatives, one to be appointed by the Speaker and one to be appointed by the minority
leader; the secretary of the Massachusetts department of transportation or his designee; a
representative of the Massachusetts historical commission, who shall serve as chair; the
commissioner of the department of conservation and recreation or his designee; 1 representative
of the Massachusetts municipal association; 1 representative of the American planning
of 2

association Massachusetts chapter; and 1 representative to be appointed by the Governor who is
an expert in Massachusetts history.
SECTION 2. The commission shall identify historic roadways in Massachusetts as well
as means for preserving and commemorating said roadways. The commission shall report the
results of its study, along with legislative recommendations if necessary, to the clerks of the
senate and house of representative no later than December 31, 2026.
of 2